Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 66 Hydrant Tampering

11-66-1.
Interference with fire hydrants.

Every person or entity engaged who for the purposes of commercial activity, who willfully or fraudulently injures or knowingly allows to be injured any fire hydrant or “dry hydrant,” so called as constructed and maintained by a fire company or district, connected with or belonging to any public waterworks or water service owned and furnished by the city of Providence or willfully tampers or meddles with any other of the appliances or appurtenances connected with or belonging to the public waterworks or water service owned and furnished by the city of Providence in a manner that causes loss or damage, shall be fined not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000), nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

This chapter shall not apply to any person who is under the age of eighteen (18) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 581, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 593, § 1.